Utah statutes.
39-6-11.   Person confined prior to trial -- Punishment limitations.

(1)  Subject to Section 39-6-9, a person in confinement prior to trial may not be subjected to punishment or penalty other than arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against him.

(2)  The arrest or confinement imposed on a prisoner may not be more rigorous than necessary to ensure the prisoner's presence.  However, he may be:

(a)  subjected to minor punishment during that period for discipline violations; and

(b)  required to perform labor as necessary for the policing and sanitation of his living quarters, mess facilities, and the area immediately adjacent to these areas, or as otherwise designated by regulations governing the housing of a prisoner.



Amended by Chapter 9, 1988 Special Session 2

